District of Columbia statutes.
50-2001

Findings.

The Council of the District of Columbia finds that:

(1)

Drivers 50 years of age and older are an increasing segment of the District of Columbia’s motorists whose unique driving habits justify the development of driver improvement training programs specifically designed for senior citizens.

(2)

Statistics indicate that although the number of annual miles driven declines for drivers 50 years of age and older, motor vehicle accident rates for senior citizens increase when measured by accidents per mile driven, and highlight the need for measures to improve highway safety by educating older drivers about their specific driving customs and experiences.

(3)

Senior citizen motor vehicle safety and driver improvement programs will improve the driving skills of older motorists, will update their driving knowledge, and will result in greater driving safety in the District of Columbia.

History

Feb. 9, 1984, D.C. Law 5-46, § 2, 30 DCR 5638
Dec. 13, 2013, D.C. Law 20-51, § 2(a), 60 DCR 15155

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-491.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-51 substituted “50 years of age” for “55 years of age” throughout the section.